Washington statutes.
RCW 28B.15.622

Waiver of fees—Persons eligible to participate in the department of defense tuition assistance program.

For military service members eligible to participate in the United States department of defense tuition assistance program, the governing boards of the community and technical colleges, the state universities, the regional universities, and The Evergreen State College may waive all or a portion of the following fees not covered by that program:

(1) Building fees as defined in RCW 28B.15.025; and

(2) Services and activities fees as defined in RCW 28B.15.041.

[ 2015 c 143 s 1.]